Utah statutes.
31A-17-404.3.   Rules.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, and this chapter, the commissioner may make rules prescribing:

(1)  the form of a letter of credit required under this chapter;

(2)  the requirements for a trust or trust instrument required by this chapter;

(3)  the procedures for licensing and accrediting; and

(4)  minimum capital and surplus requirements.



Enacted by Chapter 257, 2008 General Session

